Utah statutes.
41-19-1.   Powers and duties of governor.
The governor, in addition to other duties and responsibilities conferred upon
him by the Constitution and laws of the state of Utah is hereby empowered to
contract and to do all other things necessary in behalf of the state to secure
the full benefits available to this state under the federal Highway Safety Act
of 1966, and any amendments thereto, and in so doing, to cooperate with the
federal and state agencies, agencies private and public, interested
organizations, and with individuals, to effectuate the purposes of that
enactment, and any and all subsequent amendments thereto. The governor shall
be the official having the ultimate responsibility for dealing with the United
States Government with respect to programs and activities pursuant to the
federal Highway Safety Act of 1966, and any amendments thereto. To that end he
shall be responsible for activities of any and all departments and agencies of
this state and its subdivisions, relating thereto. He may designate an
appropriate person, commission or board to assist him in coordinating the
activities and programs contemplated under this section.
